test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-kiilj23_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kiiĺ: # Noun (23) kiiĺ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Nom: kiiĺ
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Gen: keele
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Par: kiilt
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Ill: kiilde
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Ine: [keelen, keeleh, keelehn]
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Ela: keelest
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+All: keelele
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Ade: keelel
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Abl: keelelt
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Tra: keeles
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Ter: keeleniq
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Abe: keeleldäq
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Com: keelegaq
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Nom: keeleq
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Gen: [kiili, keelte]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Par: kiili
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Ill: [kiilihe, kiili, kiilide]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Ine: [keelin, keelih, keelihn, keelten, keelteh, keeltehn]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Ela: [keelist, keeltest]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+All: [keelile, keeltele]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Ade: [keelil, keeltel]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Abl: [keelilt, keeltelt]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Tra: [keelis, keeltes]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Ter: [keeliniq, keelteniq]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Abe: [keelildäq, keelteldäq]
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Com: [kiiligaq, keeltegaq]
